Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 10
EXCLUDED PERSONS

Editor's note:

This part 10 was added in 2018 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2022. For the text of this part 10 prior to 2022, consult the 2021 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. This part 10 was relocated to part 17 of this article 30. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this part 10, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

44-30-1001 and 44-30-1002. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part repealed, (HB 22-1402), ch. 402, p. 2869, § 10, effective August 10.